test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-norm.yaml
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanidig, gimiskweyaabiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaabaniing
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaabaniin
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     2+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, gimiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyimishiniibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyimishiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyimishiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaabaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsimishiniibaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsimishiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsimishiniibaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiniidog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaabaniing
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaabaniin
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+miskweyaab+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadig, omiskweyaabiinsimishiwaadog]
     
